California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) (1) Any federal pandemic unemployment compensation, as described under Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 9021) of Chapter 116 of Title 15 of the United States Code, is exempt from consideration as
 income and resources for the purposes of determining initial and continued eligibility and grant amount for the CalWORKs program.

(2) The exemption described under paragraph (1) shall remain in effect so long as federal pandemic unemployment compensation is exempt as income for purposes of establishing eligibility for the
 CalFresh program (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6), pursuant to the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021 or any other law.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), guaranteed income payments shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources.

(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision through all-county letters or similar instructions that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations
 are adopted.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2025, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature of either of the following, whichever is later, and as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed:

(1) The Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11157, as added by the act that added this subdivision.

(2) The California Automated Response and Engagement System (CARES) can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11157, as added by the act that added this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1010, Sec. 5.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.     Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11008, all lump-sum income received by an applicant or recipient shall be regarded as income in the month received, except nonrecurring lump-sum social insurance payments, which shall include social security income, railroad retirement benefits, veteran’s benefits, workers’ compensation, and disability insurance.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this part, for purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), “income” shall be deemed to be the same as applied under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program on August 21, 1996, except that the following are exempt from consideration as income:

(1) Income that is received too infrequently to be reasonably anticipated, as exempted in federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) regulations.

(2) Income from a college work-study program under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act or Article 18 (commencing with Section 69950) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code or college work-study program, as established in the annual Budget Act, for individuals receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200).

(3) (A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (B), an award or scholarship provided by a public or private entity to or on behalf of a dependent child based on the child’s academic or extracurricular
 achievement or participation in a scholastic, educational, or extracurricular competition.

(B) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), an award or scholarship provided by a public or private entity to or on behalf of a dependent child.

(c) (1) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), any income or stipend paid by the United States Census Bureau, a governmental entity, or a nonprofit organization for temporary work related to the decennial census shall not be considered income.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be retroactive and shall apply to any income or stipend paid by the United States Census Bureau, a governmental entity, or a nonprofit organization for temporary work
 related to the most recent decennial census.

(3) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) (1) Any federal pandemic unemployment compensation, as described under Subchapter 2 (commencing with Section 9021) of Chapter 116 of Title 15 of the United States Code, is exempt from consideration as
 income and resources for the purposes of determining initial and continued eligibility and grant amount for the CalWORKs program.

(2) The exemption described under paragraph (1) shall remain in effect so long as federal pandemic unemployment compensation is exempt as income for purposes of establishing eligibility for the CalFresh program (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6), pursuant to the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021 or any other law.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for the purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), guaranteed income payments shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources.

(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision through all-county letters or similar instructions that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are adopted.

(f) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), any funds deposited and investment returns accrued in a HOPE trust account established pursuant to Chapter 16.1 (commencing with Section 18997.5) of Part 6 shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources pursuant to Section 18997.56.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2025, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature of either of the following, whichever is later:

(1) The Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(2) The California Automated Response and Engagement System (CARES) can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1010, Sec. 6.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.1.

(a) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), any support payments as defined in Section 150 of the Family Code received by an applicant or recipient that does not require assignment or cooperation with the local child support agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 11477 is exempt from consideration as income and resources for the purposes of determining initial and continued eligibility and grant amount for the CalWORKs program.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means
 of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024, or the date that the Department of Social Services has determined that necessary automation within the Statewide Automated Welfare System can be complete, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 17.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2024, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.2.

For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6, and notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, any grant, award, scholarship, loan, or fellowship benefit provided to any assistance unit member for the purpose of attending an institution of higher education, excluding cash payments made directly by friends or relatives,
 shall be exempt from consideration as income for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits or calculating grant amounts pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200). The funds described in this subdivision shall also be exempt as resources for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits or calculating grant amounts pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) for 12 months following the receipt of the funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (AB 42)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.3.

(a) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member of a governing board of a school district pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 35120 of the Education Code shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources. 

(b) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member
 of a county board of education pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1090 of the Education Code shall be exempt from consideration as income and resources.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) This section shall become operative on the date the State Department of Social Services notifies the
 Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section. The department shall issue guidance as necessary to begin automation no later than July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 686, Sec. 3.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11157.5.

The receipt of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) shall not impose any limitation or restriction upon a recipient’s right to sell, exchange, or change, the form of property holdings. However, a gift or any other transfer of assets, including income and resources, by a recipient for less than fair market value shall result in a period of ineligibility for aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) for the number of months, rounded down to the nearest whole number, that equals the quotient of the difference between the fair market value
 of the asset and the amount received for the asset divided by the standard of need applicable to the family under Section 11452. This section shall only apply to transfer of income or resources that would otherwise affect a recipient’s eligibility for benefits or the amount of benefits to which he or she would be entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11158.

The Legislature recognizes that certain property and rights owned by a recipient, including a recipient of aid to families with dependent children, are of negligible value in enabling the recipient to meet his or her present needs, and should not be classified as available resources of the recipient. It is the purpose of this section to designate such property and rights.

Resources available to a recipient, including a recipient of aid to families with dependent children shall not include all of the following:

(a) Money or securities placed in an
 irrevocable trust for funeral, cremation, or interment expenses with any of the trustees mentioned in Section 7736 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 8775 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Money or securities placed in an irrevocable trust created by a deposit in an insured savings institution made by one person of his or her own money in his or her own name as trustee for a funeral director to provide payment for funeral services rendered by the funeral director upon the depositor’s death.

(c) Life or burial insurance purchased specifically for funeral, cremation, or interment expense, which is placed in an irrevocable trust or which has no loan or surrender value available to the recipient.

(d) Securities issued by a licensed cemetery authority which by their terms are convertible only into payment
 for funeral, cremation, or interment expenses.

(e) Other funeral agreements to the extent consistent with federal law.

For the purposes of evaluating the personal property of a recipient, interment plots as defined in Section 7022 of the Health and Safety Code shall be deemed to have no value.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1447) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1402, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11159.

No payment received by, or for the benefit of any members of, an eligible household occupying an assisted unit under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 50735) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be considered as income or resources to any recipient, including a recipient of aid to families with dependent children, and such payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1045.)
-------------------------------------------

11160.

To the extent federal financial participation is available, any state agency responsible for the administration of any program under this division may establish procedures for common eligibility determination for public social service programs that aid needy families to the extent consistent with the eligibility of each program, so as to improve the efficiency of the operation of the welfare program, improve the cost-effective use of state dollars, and simplify the process for permitting qualified recipients to establish their eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 48.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Recipients’ Property Tax [11170. - 11175.]

11170.

Upon discovery that persons receiving public assistance were improperly granted homeowners’ exemptions for fiscal year 1972–1973 and preceding fiscal years, a county may request from the Director of Social Services, as unmet shelter needs, the amounts required to cancel any escape assessment existing at the time of the request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

11171.

Upon receipt of funds pursuant to its request, the county shall cancel the escape assessment and any penalty or interest thereon pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4985) of Chapter 4 of Part 9 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as if it had been imposed, levied, or charged erroneously, and if paid, a refund thereof shall be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

11172.

The receipt of funds shall be deemed as payments by the public assistance recipients and shall be accounted for as tax receipts which may be used for state, county, city, and district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

11173.

If an audit by the State Controller results in a reduction of state reimbursements for the homeowners’ property tax exemption because of persons described in Section 11170, the county shall make the reimbursements to cities and districts without regard to the Controller’s reduction, using the funds described in Sections 11171 and 11172.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

11174.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest and necessary for the public welfare to provide assistance to certain needy persons of limited income and resources in the payment of delinquent property taxes. It is further found and declared that such assistance may in some cases be most appropriately provided through the limitation of escape assessments and the cancellation of such assessments, or by a combination of limitation or cancellation, and assistance payments, rather than merely through assistance payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

11175.

Whenever a county requests additional unmet shelter needs funds so as to cancel escape assessments upon the homes of welfare recipients improperly granted the homeowners’ exemption, such request is deemed a voluntary act of the county and the county shall assume the burden of all the costs in compliance with this act. For this reason, the act involves no mandated acts within the meaning of Section 2164.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and no state reimbursement pursuant to that section is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids Act [11200. - 11526.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11200. - 11218.]

11200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids Act, and may also be cited as the CalWORKs program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 50.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11200.5.

Funding for social services under this chapter is subject to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1235.   Note: Repeal conditions in Sec. 14 of Ch. 1235 failed.)
-------------------------------------------

11201.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following shall apply:

(a) “Unemployed parent” means a natural or adoptive parent with whom the child is living.

(b) A child for whom a parent is applying for assistance under this chapter shall be considered to be deprived of parental support or care due to the unemployment of his or her parent or parents when the parent has worked less than 100 hours in the preceding four weeks and meets the requirements concerning an unemployed parent in effect on August 21, 1996, as set forth in Section 233.100 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations except for the provisions of subparagraph (i) to (v), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of that section.

(c) A family receiving aid under this chapter with a child who is considered to be deprived of parental support or care due to unemployment may continue to receive assistance regardless of the number of hours his or her parent works provided the family does not exceed the applicable gross or net income limits and is otherwise eligible for assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11202.

As used in this chapter, the term “needy child” means a child living in a family as described in Section 11250, or a child as described in Section 11401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1166, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11203.

(a) During those times as the federal government provides funds for the care of a needy relative with whom a needy child or needy children are living, aid to the child or children for any month includes aid to meet the needs of that relative, if money payments are made with respect to the child or children for that month, and if the relative is not receiving aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or 5.1 (commencing with Section 13000) of this part or Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act for that month. Needy relatives under this chapter include only natural or adoptive parents, the spouse of a natural or adoptive parent, and other needy caretaker relatives.

(b) The parent or parents shall be considered living with the
 needy child or needy children for a period of up to six months, or for a time period as determined by the department, of the needy child’s or children’s absence from the family assistance unit, and the parent or parents shall be eligible for aid as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 and childcare services under Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, as that article read on May 1, 2021, as well as services under this chapter, including services funded under Sections 15204.2 and 15204.8, and the special needs benefit specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The child has been removed from the parent or parents and placed in out-of-home care.

(2) When the child was removed from the parent or
 parents, the family was receiving aid under this section.

(3) The county has determined that the provision of aid as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 or the provision of childcare services under Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, as that article read on May 1, 2021, or the provision of services under this chapter, including services funded under Sections 15204.2 and 15204.8, and the special needs benefit specified in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 11450, is necessary for reunification.

(c) The department shall revise its state Temporary Assistance for Needy Families plan to incorporate the provisions of subdivision (b) and to incorporate the good cause exception provisions the department deems necessary as authorized by Section 608(a)(10)(B)
 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instruction that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are adopted.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2022. Prior to this date, the department shall issue comprehensive policy, fiscal, and claiming instructions to the counties. The department shall notify the Legislature when the Statewide Automated Welfare System has automated this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 32.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11204.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing any public official, agent, or representative, in carrying out any of the provisions of this chapter, to take charge of any child over the objection of either of the parents of such child, or of the person standing in the place of a parent to such child, except pursuant to a proper court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11205.

The Legislature finds and declares that the family unit is of fundamental importance to society in nurturing its members, passing on values, averting potential social problems, and providing the secure structure in which citizens live out their lives. Each family unit has the right and responsibility to provide for its own economic security by full participation in the work force to the extent possible. Each family has the right and responsibility to provide sufficient support and protection of its children, to raise them according to its values and to provide every opportunity for educational and social progress.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1329, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

11206.

In case of dispute, the application and supporting documents pertaining to his case on file in the department or on file in any county office shall be open to inspection at any time during business hours by the applicant or recipient or his attorney or agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11207.

Every county shall grant aid to any child eligible therefor, in any amount needed, not to exceed the amount specified in Section 11450, and shall administer this chapter in such a manner as to achieve the greatest possible reduction of dependency and to promote the rehabilitation of recipients. At the time of application the county department shall discuss parental responsibility with the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11208.

Caseworker services shall be made available immediately to an applicant for aid under this chapter upon the filing of his application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

11209.

The department shall make rules and regulations for the proper maintenance and care of needy children and for the administration of Aid to Families with Dependent Children. Such rules and regulations shall be binding upon the institutions, county welfare departments and any public or private agency that is responsible for the placement and care of a child receiving AFDC-FC.

The department may inquire at any time into the management of any institution or public or private agency receiving aid on behalf of children under their placement and care in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or into the management by any county of Aid to Families with Dependent Children.

If an institution, public or private agency or a county fails to comply promptly with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the department cannot be enforced in any other manner, the institution, public or private agency or county failing or refusing to comply with such provisions, rules, and regulations, or to permit the inquiry provided for in this section, shall not thereafter receive aid under the provisions of this chapter until it has complied with all such provisions, rules, and regulations and has permitted the inquiry by the department, if such inquiry is demanded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 977, Sec. 4.   Effective September 13, 1982.   Operative October 1, 1982, by Sec. 36 of Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

11210.

The department shall make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the United States Department of Health and Human Services from time to time requires, and shall comply with such provisions as that department from time to time finds necessary to assure correctness and verification of such reports. County welfare departments and any public or private agency receiving aid on behalf of children under their placement and care in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall provide the department with all information and statistics required to compile the reports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 977, Sec. 5.   Effective September 13, 1982.   Operative October 1, 1982, by Sec. 36 of Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

11211.

Rehabilitation or employment training or job placement made pursuant to any program of rehabilitation or job development and placement operated by a county welfare department or by any state agency shall not be considered completed, and the recipient shall be considered to remain unemployed, until such time as the recipient receives from his earnings an income equivalent to the amount of income which he and his family are entitled to receive pursuant to provisions of this chapter.

This section shall be operative only on a demonstration project basis in a single, urban county selected by the department, and only during such time as the Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare has waived compliance with Section 402 of the Social Security Act as permitted by Section 1115 of that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

11212.

(a) The state, through the county welfare department, shall reimburse the foster parent or foster parents for the cost of the burial plot and funeral expenses incurred for any child who, at the time of death, is receiving AFDC-FC pursuant to Section 11401 or Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program payments pursuant to Section 11461.3, to the extent that the foster parent or foster parents are not otherwise reimbursed for costs incurred for those purposes.

(b) The state, through the county welfare department, shall pay the burial costs and funeral expenses directly to the funeral home and the burial plot owner when either one of the following conditions exists:

(1) The foster parent or foster
 parents request the direct payment.

(2) The child’s death is due to alleged criminal negligence or other alleged criminal action on the part of the foster parent or foster parents.

(c) The foster parent, or the funeral home and burial plot provider, shall file a claim for reimbursement of costs with the county welfare department at the time and in the manner specified by the department. The county welfare department shall pay the claims in an amount not to exceed the level of reimbursement allowed by the California Victim Compensation Board for burial costs and funeral expenses under its Victims of Violent Crimes program, which is contained in Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Claims for the burial costs and funeral expenses for a foster child shall be paid out of funds appropriated annually to the
 department for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 17.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11213.

For the purpose of developing a more efficient, effective, and equitable Aid to Families With Dependent Children-Foster Care program, the department shall develop:

(a) A management information database providing expenditure and caseload characteristics information, such as method of entry into AFDC-FC, average cost of placement, type of facility used for placement, and average length of stay in placement.

(b) A quality control system for AFDC-FC, and recommendations to the Legislature regarding resources required for implementation of the system by October 1, 1980.

(c) Recommendations to the Legislature regarding the following:

(1) A system or systems for establishing payment levels for children eligible to the AFDC-FC program.

(2) Plans and resources required for implementation of the selected system or systems by July 1, 1981.

(d) Recommendations to the Legislature regarding defining that segment of the population to be served by the AFDC-FC program, and impact of such definition on the current AFDC-FC population.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 231.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11216.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant funds or state maintenance of effort funds may only be expended outside of the CalWORKs program if the expenditure does not result in additional caseload to be included in the calculation of the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program caseload reduction credit.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant funds authorized for any program except the CalWORKs program shall not be increased above the amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 75, Sec. 29.1.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11217.

(a) The Director of Social Services shall execute a declaration stating that increased federal financial participation in the Emergency Contingency Fund for State Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) Programs is no longer available pursuant to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA) (Public Law 111-5) or subsequent federal legislation, including an amendment to the ARRA, that maintains or extends increased federal financial participation.

(b) The director shall provide a copy of the declaration to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 32.5.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11218.

Pursuant to Section 43.3 of the Civil Code, an applicant or recipient of aid under this chapter is entitled to breastfeed her child in any public area, or area where the mother and the child are authorized to be present, in a county welfare department or other county office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   (SB 252)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Definitions [11225. - 11236.]

11225.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions contained in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11226.

“Appeal proceeding” means an administrative hearing conducted by a hearing officer of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11227.

“Audit” means a review of the claims, accounts, and documents of an auditee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11228.

“Date of mailing” means the date postmarked on the envelope if postage was prepaid and the envelope was properly addressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11229.

“Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11230.

“Director” means the Director of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11231.

“Duplicate” means a facsimile copy of the original produced by photocopying or other technique of accurate reproduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11232.

“Hearing officer” means an administrative law judge designated by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11233.

“Informal conference” means a proceeding conducted in person or by telephone for the purpose of clarifying or resolving issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11234.

“Party” means the group home provider, foster family agency, or the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11235.

“Protest” means a written request for a review. The request shall contain the basis for the provider’s objections to the audit findings or set rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

11236.

(a) “Set rate” means the per child per month rate set by the department for an AFDC-FC group home program or foster family agency.

(b) “Set rate” includes the rate set using projected data supplied by the provider for a proposed program, the rate set using data reported by the provider for an existing program, or the rate set using the results of a rate review, rate appeal, or audit done by, or on behalf of, the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 46, Sec. 2.   Effective April 10, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Eligibility for Aid [11250. - 11270.]

11250.

Aid, services, or both shall be granted under the provisions of this chapter, and subject to the regulations of the department, to families with related children under the age of 18 years, except as provided in Section 11253, in need thereof because they have been deprived of parental support or care due to:

(a) The death, physical or mental incapacity, or incarceration of a parent.

(b) The unemployment of a parent or parents.

(c) Continued absence of a parent from
 the home due to divorce, separation, desertion, or any other reason, except absence occasioned solely by reason of the performance of active duty in the uniformed services of the United States. “Continued absence” exists when the nature of the absence is such as either to interrupt or to terminate the parent’s functioning as a provider of maintenance, physical care, or guidance for the child, and the known or indefinite duration of the absence precludes counting on the parent’s performance of the function of planning for the present support or care of the child. If these conditions exist, the parent may be absent for any reason, and may have left only recently or some time previously.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1552, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11250.4.
